test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_holhod_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - holhođ: # MLO
    holhođ+V+Inf: holhođ
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: holhoom
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: holhooh
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: holhoo
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: holhojeen
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: holhoovettee
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: holhov
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: holhop
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: holhoovetteđ
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: holhojeh
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: holhojim
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: holhojih
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: holhoi
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: holhoim
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: holhoid
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: holhoin
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: holhoim
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: holhoid
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: holhojii
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: holhooččim
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: holhooččih
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: holhooččij
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: holhooččáim
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: holhooččáid
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: holhooččáin
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: holhooččijm
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: holhooččijd
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: holhooččii
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: holhoožeem
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: holhoožeeh
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: holhoš
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: holhoožeen
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: holhošvettee
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: holhoožává
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: holhoožep
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: holhošvetteđ
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: holhoožeh

    holhođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: holhoo
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: holhojus
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Du1: holhojoon
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Du2: holhojee
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Du3: holhojus
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: holhojop
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: holhođ
    holhođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: holhojus
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: holhoo
    holhođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: holhom
    holhođ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: holhooččii
    holhođ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: holhoožii 
    holhođ+V+PrsPrc: [holhojeijee, holhojijjee]
    holhođ+V+PrfPrc: holhom
    holhođ+V+Actio+Nom: holhom
    holhođ+V+Actio+Ess: holhoomin
    holhođ+V+Actio+Loc: holhoomist
    holhođ+V+Actio+Ill: holhoomân
    holhođ+V+Actio+Com: holhoodijn
    holhođ+V+VAbess: holhoohánnáá
